Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8272.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 11 of the General Laws entitled "CRIMINAL OFFENSES" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 71
LAW ENFORCEMENT SEXUAL MISCONDUCT
11-71-1. Definitions.
The following words and phrases, when used in this chapter, have the following meanings:
(1) "Force or coercion" shall have the same meaning as in § 11-37-1.
(2) "Peace officer" shall have the same meaning as in § 12-7-21.
(3) “Sexual contact” shall have the same meeting as in § 11-37-1.
(4) “Sexual penetration” shall have the same meaning as in § 11-37-1.
11-71-2. Law enforcement sexual penetration prohibited.
(a) A person is guilty of law enforcement sexual penetration if:
(1) He or she is a peace officer; and
(2) Engages in sexual penetration during the course of duty with another person who has
been seized, is detained, has been placed in custody, has been placed under arrest, is confined in a
correctional or law enforcement facility or vehicle, and/or is the subject of an investigation or
questioning.
(b) A person convicted of a violation of this chapter shall be punished by imprisonment for
a period not to exceed five (5) years.

(c) It shall be an affirmative defense that the act of sexual penetration resulted from force
or coercion by the alleged victim or victims.
(d) Consent of the victim shall not be a defense to a prosecution under this section.
(e) Any sentence imposed under this chapter shall run concurrently with any other sentence
imposed for the same case.
11-71-3. Law enforcement sexual contact prohibited.
(a) A person is guilty of law enforcement sexual contact if:
(1) He or she is a peace officer; and
(2) Engages in sexual contact during the course of duty with another person who has been
seized, is detained, has been placed in custody, has been placed under arrest, is confined in a
correctional or law enforcement facility or vehicle, and/or is the subject of an investigation or
questioning.
(b) A person convicted of a violation of this chapter shall be punished by imprisonment for
a period not to exceed eighteen (18) months.
(c) It shall be an affirmative defense that the act of sexual contact resulted from force or
coercion by the alleged victim or victims.
(d) Consent of the victim shall not be a defense to a prosecution under this section.
(e) Any sentence imposed under this chapter shall run concurrently with any other sentence
imposed for the same case.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006061
========
LC006061 - Page 2 of 3